test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-saabas14_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - saabas: # Noun (14) saabas 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     saabas+N+Sg+Nom: saabas
     saabas+N+Sg+Gen: saapa
     saabas+N+Sg+Par: saabast
     saabas+N+Sg+Ill: [saapahe, saapadõ]
     saabas+N+Sg+Ine: [saapan, saapah, saapahn]
     saabas+N+Sg+Ela: saapast
     saabas+N+Sg+All: saapalõ
     saabas+N+Sg+Ade: saapal
     saabas+N+Sg+Abl: saapalt
     saabas+N+Sg+Tra: saapas
     saabas+N+Sg+Ter: saapaniq
     saabas+N+Sg+Abe: saapaldaq
     saabas+N+Sg+Com: saapagaq
     saabas+N+Pl+Nom: saapaq
     saabas+N+Pl+Gen: [saapidõ, saapiidõ, saabastõ]
     saabas+N+Pl+Par: [saapit, saapiid]
     saabas+N+Pl+Ill: [saapihe, saapiihe, saapidõ, saapiidõ, saabastõhe, saabastõdõ]
     saabas+N+Pl+Ine: [saapin, saapiin, saapih, saapiih, saapihn, saapiihn, saabastõn, saabastõh, saabastõhn]
     saabas+N+Pl+Ela: [saapist, saapiist, saabastõst]
     saabas+N+Pl+All: [saapilõ, saapiilõ, saabastõlõ]
     saabas+N+Pl+Ade: [saapil, saapiil, saabastõl]
     saabas+N+Pl+Abl: [saapilt, saapiilt, saabastõlt]
     saabas+N+Pl+Tra: [saapis, saapiis, saabastõs]
     saabas+N+Pl+Ter: [saapiniq, saapiiniq, saabastõniq]
     saabas+N+Pl+Abe: [saapildaq, saapiildaq, saabastõldaq]
     saabas+N+Pl+Com: [saapidõgaq, saapiidõgaq, saabastõgaq]
